Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 872 (4) 91 nls/ko/md H.F. 872 Section 1. Section 15.102, subsection 12, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. âTargeted small businessâ means a small business any 3 enterprise which is fifty-one percent or more owned, operated, 4 and actively managed by one or more women, minority persons, 5 service-disabled veterans, or persons with a disability 6 provided the business enterprise meets all of the following 7 requirements: 8 (1) Is located in this state. 9 (2) Is operated for profit and under single management . 10 (3) Has fewer than twenty employees and an annual gross 11 income of less than four ten million dollars computed as an 12 average of the three preceding fiscal years. 13 -1- HF 872 (4) 91 nls/ko/md 1/ 1